Washington statutes.
RCW 39.50.900

Chapter cumulative—Applicability to joint operating agencies.

The authority granted by this chapter shall be in addition and supplemental to any authority previously granted and shall not limit any other powers or authority previously granted to any municipal corporation. The authority granted by this chapter to public utility districts organized under Title 54 RCW shall not extend to joint operating agencies organized under chapter 43.52 RCW.

[ 1982 c 216 s 9.]